Washington statutes.
RCW 40.14.170

Legislative records—Sound recordings.

Any sound recording of debate in the house or senate made by legislative employees shall be preserved by the chief clerk of the house and by the secretary of the senate, respectively, for two years from the end of the session at which made, and thereafter shall be transmitted to the state archivist. The chief clerk and the secretary shall catalogue or index the recordings in their custody according to a uniform system, in order to allow easy access to the debate on specific questions before either house, and shall make available to any court of record, at the cost of reproduction, such portions of the recordings as the court may request.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 102 s 9.]